California statutes. Civil Code
If the borrower disputes the amount of the appraisal, the borrower, within 30 days of the anniversary date of the loan, may procure an appraisal of the property at the borrower’s expense by a qualified independent appraiser, and a copy of the appraisal shall be sent by first-class mail to the lender within the 30-day period.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.042.

If the appraisal by the appraiser selected by the borrower is lower in amount than the appraisal by the appraiser selected by the lender, the amount to be used to calculate the annual adjustment shall be one-half of the sum of the two appraisals.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.043.

The appraisal amount, as determined pursuant to Section 1917.040 if the borrower does not dispute the appraisal amount, or 1917.042 if the borrower disputes the appraisal amount, shall constitute the value of the property from and after the anniversary date of the loan for the purpose of determining the property’s adjusted fair market value under Section 1917.020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.044.

The qualifications of the appraisers may be specified by the terms of the shared appreciation loan for purposes of this article and Article 5 (commencing with Section 1917.050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Improvements [1917.050. - 1917.050.]

1917.050.

The borrower may have the cost of capital improvements to the security property completed within any 12-month period, and with an appraised value in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), added to the borrower’s cost of the property, for purposes of determining the contingent deferred interest, but only if the procedures set forth in this article are followed.

(a) Within 60 days following the completion of the improvements, the borrower shall send by first-class mail a notice of the completion of the improvements to the lender and shall
 submit proof of cost of the improvements.

(b) Within 90 days following the completion of the improvements, the lender shall select an appraiser to perform an appraisal to determine the increase in value of the property, if any, by reason of the improvements. A copy of the appraisal shall be sent by first-class mail to the borrower, together with a notice informing the borrower that the appraisal will constitute a final and conclusive determination of the increase in the value of the property by reason of the improvement for purposes of computing the net appreciated value of the property, and that if the borrower disputes the amount of the appraisal, the borrower may procure an independent appraisal as provided in subdivision (c). The lender may require the borrower to pay for the cost of the appraisal.

(c) If the borrower disputes the amount of the appraisal, the borrower, within
 120 days of the completion of the improvements, may secure at borrower’s expense, a qualified, independent appraiser to perform an appraisal to determine the increase in value of the property, if any, by reason of the improvements, and a copy of the appraisal shall be sent by first-class mail to the lender within that period of time.

(d) If the appraisal of the appraiser selected by the borrower is greater in amount than the appraisal by the appraiser selected by the lender, the amount of the appraisal, for the purposes of this section, shall be one-half of the sum of the two appraisals.

(e) The lesser of the borrower’s actual cost or the appraised increase in the value of the property by reason of the improvements shall be available as a credit to the buyer for purposes of determining net appreciated value, except as provided in subdivision (f).

(f) If 50 percent or more of the value of the labor or other work on the improvements was performed by the borrower, then the appraised increase in the value of the property by reason of the improvements shall be the cost of capital improvements for purposes of establishing the credit under this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. General Provisions [1917.060. - 1917.069.]

1917.060.

The relationship of the borrower and the lender, as to a shared appreciation loan, is that of debtor and creditor and shall not be, or be construed to be, a joint venture, equity venture, partnership, or other relationship.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.061.

Any waiver of any right of a borrower under the provisions of this chapter shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.062.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 711, a provision in a shared appreciation loan (not including the refinancing obligation) permitting the lender to accelerate the maturity date of the principal and accrued interest on the loan upon a sale or other transfer of the property, as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 1917.031, shall be valid and enforceable against the borrower, except as may be precluded by Section 2924.6.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that potential exposure to liability for enforcement of a “due-on-sale” clause
 consistent with Section 711, as interpreted by the courts, makes use of such a provision impractical. Moreover, the additional risks to the lender inherent in shared appreciation financing are greater with longer loan terms (which are more desirable from the standpoint of housing affordability), but this risk is reduced with an enforceable “due-on-sale” clause. Therefore, in order to facilitate shared appreciation financing, it is necessary to establish the exception specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.063.

This chapter facilitates the making of shared appreciation financing in this state which conforms to the provisions of this chapter. The terms and conditions of any shared appreciation loan made pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with this chapter. This chapter does not, however, apply to or limit shared appreciation financing of real property of a type specified in Section 1917.030 that is made pursuant to other provisions of law, or which is not otherwise unlawful. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to in any way affect shared appreciation financing of commercial property or residential property not
 meeting the criteria specified in Section 1917.030.

Nothing in this chapter precludes a pension fund specified in Section 1917.030 from providing shared appreciation financing pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1917.110) or any other provision of law, or which is not otherwise unlawful.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1346, Sec. 5.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.064.

A shared appreciation loan shall not be subject to any provision of this code or the Financial Code which limits the interest rate or change of interest rate of variable, adjustable, or renegotiable interest instruments, or which requires particular language or provisions in security instruments securing variable, adjustable, or renegotiable rate obligations or in evidences of such debts.

This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.065.

The lien of a deed of trust securing a shared appreciation loan shall include and secure the principal amount of the shared appreciation loan, and all interest, whether accrued or to be accrued, including all amounts of contingent deferred interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.066.

The lien of a shared appreciation loan, including the principal amount and all interest, whether accrued or to be accrued, and all amounts of contingent deferred interest, shall attach from the time of the recordation of the deed of trust securing the loan, and the lien, including the lien of the interest accrued or to be accrued and of the contingent deferred interest, shall have priority over any other lien or encumbrance affecting the property secured by the shared appreciation instrument which is recorded after the time of recordation of the shared appreciation instrument. However, nothing in this section or
 Section 1917.165 shall preclude a junior lien or encumbrance subordinate to the obligation of the shared appreciation loan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.067.

Lenders shall be exempt from the usury provisions of Article XV of the California Constitution with respect to shared appreciation loans made pursuant to this chapter.

This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.068.

The qualification requirements of Sections 25110, 25120, and 25130 of the Corporations Code shall not apply to a shared appreciation loan, provided (1) the loan obligation is evidenced by one promissory note secured by a deed of trust which is not one of a series of notes secured by interests in the same real property and (2) the loan obligation is not evidenced by fractional undivided interests in one promissory note secured by interests in the same real property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.069.

The aggregate amount of any fee charged to the borrower for processing an application and preparing any necessary documents in connection with originating a shared appreciation loan shall not exceed the reasonable cost of providing the service. No prepaid interest shall be charged to the borrower, but nothing in this chapter shall preclude a lender from requiring a fee for providing commitments for shared appreciation loans to builders or others who will not be the ultimate borrower.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Notices and Disclosures [1917.070. - 1917.075.]

1917.070.

(a) The disclosures made pursuant to this chapter, as required, shall be the only disclosures required to be made pursuant to state law for shared appreciation loans, notwithstanding any contrary provisions applicable to loans not made under this chapter, except those, if any, that may be required by reason of the application of Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of the Corporations Code, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code. A lender may, but shall not be required to, supplement the disclosures required by this article
 with additional disclosures that are not inconsistent with the disclosures required by this article. 

(b) When very specific language is prescribed by this chapter, substantially the same language shall be utilized if possible, but reasonably equivalent language may be used to the extent necessary or appropriate to achieve a clearer or more accurate disclosure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.071.

(a) Each lender offering shared appreciation loans shall furnish to a prospective borrower, on the earlier of the date on which the lender first provides written information concerning shared appreciation loans from such lender or provides a loan application form to the prospective borrower, a written disclosure as provided in this section.

(b) The disclosure shall be entitled “INFORMATION ABOUT THE (Name of Lender) SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN,” and shall describe the operation and effect of the shared appreciation loan including a
 brief summary of its terms and conditions, together with a statement consisting of substantially the following language, to the extent applicable to such loan: 
INFORMATION ABOUT THE [Name of Lender] SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN
(Name of Lender) is pleased to offer you the opportunity to finance your home through a shared appreciation loan.

Because the shared appreciation loan differs from the usual mortgage loan, the law requires that you should read and understand before you sign the loan documents.

The loan will bear a stated rate of interest which will be one-third below the prevailing market interest rate. In exchange for a stated interest rate which is below the prevailing rate, you will be obligated to pay us additional interest later. This additional interest is called
 “contingent deferred interest.” 
Contingent Deferred Interest
This loan provides that you, as borrower, must pay to us, as lender, as contingent deferred interest, one-third of the net appreciated value of the real property which secures the loan. This contingent interest is due and payable when the property is sold or transferred, when the loan is paid in full, upon any acceleration of the loan upon default, or at the end of the term of the loan, whichever first occurs. The dollar amount of contingent interest which you will be required to pay cannot be determined at this time. If the property does not appreciate, you will owe us nothing.

Your obligation to pay contingent interest will reduce the amount of the appreciation, if any, that you will realize on the property. This appreciation will not produce a real gain
 in your equity in the property, unless the appreciation rate exceeds the general inflation rate, but you will be required to pay a portion of the appreciation as contingent interest without regard to whether the appreciation has resulted in a real gain.

When you sell or refinance your home, you normally will receive enough cash to pay the shared appreciation loan balance, accrued interest, prepayment penalty (if applicable), the contingent interest, and expenses of sale. However, if you sell with only a small downpayment, you may possibly not receive enough cash to pay the contingent interest, and, in that event, it will be necessary for you to provide cash from other funds.

If you do not sell the property before the end of the term of this loan, you will need to refinance this loan at that time. The term of this loan is (duration) years. We will offer to refinance the outstanding obligation, including any contingent
 interest, at that time. If you refinance this loan, your monthly payments may increase substantially if the property appreciates significantly or if the interest rate on the refinancing loan is much higher than today’s prevailing rates. In general, the more your property appreciated, the larger will be the amount of the contingent interest that you will have an obligation to pay or refinance.

The contingent interest will not become due if title to the property is transferred on your death to a spouse, or where a transfer results from a decree of dissolution of a marriage and a spouse becomes the sole owner. Calculating the Contingent InterestContingent
 interest will be calculated as follows:FAIR MARKET VALUE OF THE PROPERTY (Sale price or amount of value determined by appraisal.)–(less)BORROWER’S COST OF THE PROPERTY (This amount includes certain costs paid by you incident to the purchase.)–(less)COST OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS MADE BY YOU IN ANY 12-MONTH PERIOD (Must exceed $2,500 in value. The actual amount may be the lesser of actual cost or appraised value.)_(equals)NET APPRECIATED VALUE×(times)ONE-THIRD PERCENTAGE OWED TO LENDER_(equals)TOTAL CONTINGENT INTERESTDetermining Net Appreciated Value
We are entitled to receive one-third of the net appreciated value of the property as contingent interest. As explained above, net appreciated value equals (1) the fair market value of the property at the time of the sale or appraisal, less (2) your cost of the property, less (3) the value of any capital improvements for which you are entitled to credit. 
Determining Fair Market Value
Fair market value is the sale price of the property in the case of a bona fide sale of the property made before the maturity of the shared appreciation loan, excluding certain foreclosure related sales. In all other cases, fair market value is determined by our most recent annual appraisal of the property. If you desire to contest the amount of our annual appraisal,
 you may obtain another appraisal by a qualified independent appraiser within 30 days after the anniversary date of the loan and send a copy of the appraisal to us by first-class mail within that 30-day period. If your appraiser’s appraisal is lower than our appraisal, the annual appraisal shall equal one-half the sum of the two appraisals. 
Determining Value of Capital Improvements
The cost or value of certain capital improvements (but no maintenance or repair costs) may be added to your cost of the property for the purpose of determining the net appreciated value, but only if the procedures set forth in the shared appreciation loan documents are followed. It is important to note that capital improvements completed and for which a credit is claimed in any 12-month period must cost or be appraised at more than two thousand
 five hundred dollars ($2,500). The lesser of the cost or appraised value will control. However, if you have performed at least half the value of the labor or other work involved, then the appraised value of the improvements will control. The appraised value of the improvements shall be considered to be the increase in the value of the property resulting from the improvements. You will receive no credit for improvements that are not appraised at more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). 
Cost of Appraisals
The terms of this loan call for annual appraisals of the property, and for additional appraisals to value improvements or in the event of a dispute regarding the value of the property or improvements. The cost of the appraisals will be paid as follows: 
Your Right to Refinance This Loan
If the property is not sold or transferred prior to the maturity of the loan, we will offer to refinance the outstanding obligation on the loan, including any contingent interest. We will offer refinancing at the then prevailing interest rate either directly or through another mortgage lender.

The terms of the refinancing loan will be like home loans offered at that time by banks or savings and loan associations, but you are assured that at least one of the options will be a fully amortizing 30-year loan. The interest rate on the refinancing loan may be either fixed or adjustable, as provided in your shared appreciation loan.

We will not be permitted to look to the forecast of your income in offering to refinance. The interest rate and monthly payment
 upon refinancing cannot be determined at this time. They may be either more or less burdensome to you than the currently prevailing rates and terms. 
Tax Consequences
Use of the shared appreciation loan will have income tax or estate planning consequences which will depend upon your own financial and tax situation. FOR FURTHER INFORMATION, YOU ARE URGED TO CONSULT YOUR OWN ACCOUNTANT, ATTORNEY OR OTHER FINANCIAL ADVISER. THE QUESTIONS YOU SHOULD DISCUSS INCLUDE THE TAX DEDUCTIBILITY OF THE CONTINGENT INTEREST PAYMENT, YOUR RIGHT TO UTILIZE THAT DEDUCTION IN YEARS OTHER THAN THE YEAR IT IS PAID, AND THE EFFECT OF THE LOSS OF TAX BENEFITS BEFORE THAT TIME. 
Other Important Information
(Here insert additional description, if necessary, of the operation and effect of the shared appreciation loan.

The foregoing describes our shared appreciation loan, includes a summary of all of its important provisions, and informs you of some of the risks of a shared appreciation loan.

If your loan application is accepted by us, we will provide you with more information about your particular shared appreciation loan, which will include a comparison with conventional mortgages, an illustration of the possible increase in your monthly payments upon refinancing, and other important information.

Before you enter into a shared appreciation loan with us, we recommend that you and your attorney or tax accountant review the loan documents for the full text of all of the terms and conditions which will govern
 the loan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.072.

(a) Each lender making a shared appreciation loan shall also furnish to the prospective borrower, prior to the consummation of the loan, the disclosures required by Subpart C of Federal Reserve Board Regulation Z (12 CFR Part 226), including 12 CFR Section 226.18(f), to the extent applicable to the transaction.

(b) The disclosure made pursuant to paragraph (a) and Regulation Z shall be based on the fixed interest rate of the shared appreciation loan, and shall include a description of the shared appreciation feature, including (1)
 the conditions for its imposition, the time at which it would be collected, and the limitations on the lender’s share, as required by the Federal Reserve Board in the information published by the Board at 46 Federal Register 20877 and 20878 (April 7, 1981), and (2) the lender’s share of the net appreciated value and the prevailing interest rate as defined in Section 1917.120(h).

(c) The disclosure made pursuant to paragraph (a) and Regulation Z shall be accompanied by (1) one or more transaction-specific examples of the operation and effect the shared appreciation loan, and (2) the following charts, comparing the shared appreciation loan and a conventional loan made at the prevailing interest rate, and illustrating the possible increase in the monthly payments, and the possible annual percentage rate of finance charge, on the assumptions therein stated: Chart 1CONVENTIONAL MORTGAGE AT ____%If the same loan balance were financed under a conventional, 30-year, fixed-rate, level-payment mortgage, your monthly payments would be:Years 1–30$_______/mo.Chart 2IF YOU REFINANCE THIS TRANSACTION AT ___%If your property appreciates at 10% per year, and if your loan balance (including contingent deferred interest due) at the end of __ years is refinanced at __% (the prevailing market interest rate now), your monthly payments will be:Years 1–__Refinancing loan$_______/mo.$_______/mo.**Refinancing loan, assuming a conventional, 30-year, fixed-rate, level-payment mortgage. Other mortgage instruments, e.g., graduated-payment or shared appreciation, if available, may result in lower payments.Chart 3APR IF PROPERTY APPRECIATES AT 10%If your property appreciates at 10% per year, the total finance charge on your shared appreciation loan (including contingent interest) will equal $____, and the annual percentage rate of the total finance charge (including contingent interest) will equal ____%.(d) The disclosures required by paragraph (c) shall be separated from the disclosures required by Regulation Z, and may be presented in the document containing the disclosures required by Regulation Z or in one or more separate documents. 

(e) Except to the extent that this section requires disclosure of additional information not required by Regulation Z, compliance with the applicable credit disclosure requirements of Regulation Z shall constitute compliance with the requirements of this section.

(f) The disclosures prescribed in Section 1917.171 shall be physically attached to the disclosures required by this section and Regulation Z at the time such disclosures are furnished to the borrower.

(g) In the event federal law is amended so that this section is inconsistent therewith, the federal law shall prevail as to the disclosures required by this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.073.

Each lender making a shared appreciation loan shall additionally furnish to the prospective borrower, prior to the consummation of the loan, a statement containing the following information:
IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT YOUR SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN
You are being offered a shared appreciation loan. Before you decide to accept this loan read this statement, which is designed to provide important information that you should consider.

1. Prevailing interest rate: __%.

2. Fixed interest rate on this loan: __%.

3. Lender’s share of net appreciated value: one-third.

4. Amount of this loan: $__.

5. Amount of the monthly payments: $__.

6. Term of this loan: __ years.

7. Amortization period on which payments are calculated: 30 years.

8. Prepayment penalty (if any) __.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.074.

Each deed of trust and evidence of debt executed in connection with a shared appreciation loan shall contain a statement, printed or written in a size equal to at least 12-point bold type, consisting of substantially the following language: “THIS IS A [DURATION] SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN. THE LENDER'S INTEREST INCLUDES ONE-THIRD OF THE NET APPRECIATED VALUE OF THE PROPERTY. FOR FURTHER INFORMATION, READ THE FLYER "INFORMATION ABOUT THE [NAME OF LENDER] SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN.'" The notice required by this section shall be completed to state the term of the shared appreciation
 loan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.075.

Where, pursuant to any provision of law, the lender is required to disclose the amount of interest due or to be due under a shared appreciation loan and the amount of contingent deferred interest due or to be due is not known, the lender may disclose that fact and specify in the disclosure the method for calculating contingent deferred interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.   Inoperative January 1, 1990, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Shared Appreciation Loans [1917.110. - 1917.175.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Declarations [1917.110. - 1917.110.]

1917.110.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) It is necessary and essential that the state provide and promote alternative means of supplying affordable housing to the citizens of the state.

(b) Because of current economic conditions, including the unprecedented fluctuation in interest rates, alternative mortgage instruments must be developed to supplement the standard long-term, fixed-rate mortgage.

(c) State facilitation of the shared appreciation loan will serve the need to develop alternative means of financing housing, particularly new homes, and will help to create vitally needed jobs in the construction industry.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [1917.120. - 1917.120.]

1917.120.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Borrower” means the recipient or recipients of a shared appreciation loan and includes any successor in interest to the borrower under a shared appreciation loan, to the extent such succession is permitted by law or by the terms of the shared appreciation loan.

(b) “Borrower’s cost of the property” means the price paid by the borrower for the purchase of the property to be financed with a shared appreciation loan
 and also includes documentary transfer taxes, escrow and recording fees, title insurance premiums, and any other fees directly paid by the borrower as a necessary or customary cost of consummating acquisition of the property. However, if the purchase price to be paid for the property does not reasonably reflect the true value of the property, the borrower may request that, in lieu of the actual price paid, the “borrower’s cost of the property” be established at an amount mutually agreed by the lender and borrower or be established by averaging two appraisals in the same manner as specified in Section 1917.142 for determination of fair market value. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require a lender to make shared appreciation loans with the borrower’s cost of the property established on the basis of appraisals.

(c) “Contingent deferred interest” means the lender’s share of net appreciated value, calculated as the sum resulting
 upon multiplying the net appreciated value by a percentage agreed by the lender and borrower, not to exceed 50 percent.

(d) “Fair market value” means the highest price on the date of valuation that would be agreed to by a seller, being willing to sell but under no particular or urgent necessity for so doing, nor obliged to sell, and a buyer, being ready, willing, and able to buy but under no particular necessity for so doing, each dealing with the other with full knowledge of all the uses and purposes for which the property is reasonably adaptable and available.

Fair market value shall be determined pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 1917.140).

(e) “Lender” means any person who makes a shared appreciation loan or the successor in interest to any such person.

(f) “Net appreciated value” means the fair market value less the sum of the borrower’s cost of the property and the value of capital improvements. Nothing in this chapter shall, however, preclude a shared appreciation loan from additionally including a provision requiring deduction of any or all of the borrower’s costs of selling the property from fair market value in determining, “net appreciated value,” and if such a provision is included, the disclosures required by Section 1917.171 shall be modified accordingly.

(g) “Prevailing rate” means the weighted average yield accepted by the Federal National Mortgage Association in its most recent free market system auction for four-month conventional mortgage commitments. In the event that the Federal National Mortgage Association discontinues or substantially alters its free market system auction for conventional mortgages then the “prevailing rate” shall be the average yield
 established at the most recent immediate delivery auction of the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or if the auction has been discontinued, then the “prevailing rate” shall be specified in the shared appreciation loan as either (1) the most recently published Federal Home Loan Bank Board mortgage contract rate or (2) the average single-family home mortgage rate for the 10 largest savings and loan associations with principal offices in this state. 

(h) “Property” means the property financed by the shared appreciation loan. 

(i) “Sale” means any transfer of title to the property and additionally includes the execution of an installment sale contract giving the purchaser a right to possess the property before transfer of title, refinancing, judicial sale on execution or other legal process of foreclosure or trustee’s sale (regardless of whether initiated by the lender), but
 “sale” does not include a transfer specified in Section 2924.6.

(j) “Shared appreciation loan” means any loan made pursuant to this chapter upon the security of owner-occupied real property of a type specified in Section 1917.130, and in connection with which the lender has a right to receive a share of the appreciation in the value of the security property. “Shared appreciation loan” includes a deed of trust and any evidence of debt issued in connection with the loan.

(k) “Value of capital improvements” means the amount of the credit or credits for capital improvements, if any, determined pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 1917.150).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Terms and Conditions [1917.130. - 1917.135.]

1917.130.

Lenders may make shared appreciation loans pursuant to this chapter for the purchase of real property improved with one- to four-dwelling units, including structures ancillary to such dwelling units and including attached single-family dwelling units, single-family mobilehome units placed upon permanent foundations, residential condominium units, and dwelling units within a planned unit development. Shared appreciation loans shall be made to finance only owner-occupied dwelling units, but in the case of two- to four-unit dwellings financed under this chapter only one of the
 units need be owner-occupied. A dwelling unit shall be conclusively deemed to be owner-occupied for purposes of this chapter if an original recipient of the shared appreciation loan certifies in writing to the lender at the time the loan is made that he or she will occupy the property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.131.

A shared appreciation loan shall include the following terms and conditions:

(a) The term of the loan, excluding any refinancing under Section 1917.133, shall be at least seven years, but not more than 30 years.

(b) The repayment schedule for the loan, excluding any refinancing under Section 1917.133, shall be cast so that full amortization of the principal amount of the loan would occur in not less than 30 nor more than 40 years, regardless of the
 actual term of the loan. Any principal balance remaining at maturity shall be due and payable at that time, unless refinanced as provided in Section 1917.133. Monthly installment payments shall be equal in amount, except for the final payment when a principal balance is remaining at maturity, and in addition to amortization of principal shall include fixed interest pursuant to subdivision (d).

(c) The loan shall be secured by a deed of trust on the real property financed.

(d) The loan shall bear interest at a fixed rate, which shall be established in relation to the prevailing rate (1) in effect 90 days prior to the loan closing, (2) in effect at another date between that date and the loan closing if and as mutually agreed by the lender and borrower, or (3) in effect at the time of the lender’s loan commitment given to the borrower or to the person from whom the borrower purchases
 the property. The percentage by which the fixed interest rate is reduced below the applicable prevailing rate shall be at least one-half the lender’s percentage share of net appreciated value which is contingent deferred interest, except that if the shared appreciation loan is for less than 80 percent of the borrower’s purchase price of the property, the percentage by which the fixed interest rate is reduced below the applicable prevailing rate shall be at least two-thirds the lender’s percentage share of net appreciated value which is contingent deferred interest.

(e) The borrower shall additionally be obligated to pay to the lender contingent deferred interest (1) at the time of sale of the property if the lender accelerates the principal balance of the loan in accordance with a provision in the shared appreciation loan authorized by Section 1917.162, (2) at the time the loan is prepaid in full, upon acceleration of the loan upon default, or
 (3) upon the maturity of the loan, whichever first occurs.

(f) The aggregate amount of any fee charged to the borrower by the lender for processing an application, preparing any necessary documents, obtaining a credit report, or any other costs incurred by the lender in connection with originating a shared appreciation loan shall not exceed two percent of the principal amount of the loan or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater. No prepaid interest shall be charged to the borrower, but nothing in this chapter shall preclude a lender from requiring a fee for providing commitments for shared appreciation loans to builders or others who purchase such commitments and who will not be the ultimate borrower.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.132.

(a) The borrower shall have the right to prepay, at any time, in full or in part, the principal loan balance of the shared appreciation loan, together with accrued interest, including contingent deferred interest.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a borrower from obligating himself or herself, by an agreement in writing, to pay a prepayment charge upon prepayment of the loan, in full or in part, made within five years of the date of execution of the shared appreciation loan.

(c) Any prepayment charge imposed upon the prepayment of a shared appreciation loan shall not exceed the amount authorized and specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2954.9.

(d) No prepayment charge shall be imposed as to any portion of the contingent deferred interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.133.

(a) If a shared appreciation loan with an original term of less than 10 years is not prepaid in full or the property is not sold or transferred prior to maturity of the loan, and provided the borrower is not then in default, the lender shall offer or arrange for refinancing of the unpaid balance of the loan upon maturity and all contingent deferred interest. The refinancing may be provided directly by the lender or another mortgage lender, or the lender may arrange at the time of making the shared appreciation loan for the refinancing to be provided by a